Louisiana, session 2026, HB662.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:56(A)(1) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
56:126(G) and 126.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§56. Seizure or surrender of things illegally used or possessed
A. Any enforcing officer may seize:
(1) Any dead animal or parts thereof, possessed, transported, sold, offered
for sale, or purchased contrary to the provisions of this Title.
* * *
B. Any live animal which is illegal to possess or which may be possessed
only by permit or license from the department may be voluntarily surrendered to the
department without penalty. The person surrendering the animal shall be immune
from prosecution for illegally possessing or possessing without a permit or license
provided the surrendering of the animal is initiated prior to any independent
investigation or contact by any public employee operating in their official capacity.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-78 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 662
The Except as otherwise provided for in R.S. 56:126.1, the department may dispose
of a surrendered animal in any manner the department deems appropriate.
* * *
§126. Wildlife Rehabilitation Program; exemption
* * *
G. The provisions of this Section shall have prospective and retroactive
application to apply to any animal in the possession of any person as provided for by
the provisions of this Section regardless of when the animal was initially possessed.
§126.1. Seizure of sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife; contradictory hearing
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no employee,
officer, or agent of the Louisiana Department of Wildlife and Fisheries shall have the
authority to seize any sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife in the possession of an
individual pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 56:126 without the issuance of a
warrant authorizing the seizure from the district court of the parish where the
individual in possession of the sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife resides.
B. No sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife seized pursuant to the provisions
of this Section shall be euthanized without a contradictory hearing and court order
that the animal poses an immediate danger to the public health, safety, and welfare
of the citizens of Louisiana and authorizing that the animal be humanely euthanized.
C. The individual in possession of sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife that has
been seized pursuant to the provisions of this Section, without the payment of any
costs, shall be authorized to file a petition in the district court where the individual
resides requesting a hearing for the purpose of determining whether the sick, injured
or orphaned wildlife shall be humanely euthanized.
D. Upon the filing of the petition, the district judge shall immediately issue
a rule to show cause on the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries why the sick,
injured, or orphaned wildlife should be euthanized. This rule shall, at the time of its
issuance, be fixed for hearing not later than five days, including Sundays,
half-holidays and holidays, from the date of its issuance, and shall be heard by
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-78 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 662
preference over all other matters and cases fixed for the same day and shall be heard
continuously day after day until submitted for adjudication.
E. Upon the showing made by the parties on the trial of the rule to show
cause, the court shall determine both of the following:
(1) If the sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife poses an immediate danger to
the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of Louisiana.
(2) If the individual seeking to possess the sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife
has met all of the requirements provided for in R.S. 56:126(B).
F. In every case where sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife is not determined
to pose an immediate danger to the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of
Louisiana, the court shall order the individual to comply with the conditions
established for possession of that wildlife pursuant to R.S. 56:126(B) if they have not
already done so and order the sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife be returned to the
individual.
G. In every case where the sick, injured, or orphaned wildlife is determined
to pose an immediate danger to the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of
Louisiana, the court shall issue an order directing that the sick, injured, or orphaned
wildlife be humanely euthanized.
H. The pleading, practice, and procedure in all cases under this Section shall,
in addition to the requirements of this Section, be in accordance with the Code of
Civil Procedure and the laws and rules of court governing practice before the district
courts of this state.